src/morphology/stems/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON ateq
Akutaĸ+Dial/Vgr:Akutaĸ Z1Mask_taqZ ;
Aligoĸ:Aligoĸ Z1Mask_goqZ ;
Alluaq+Dial/Vgr:Alluaq Z1Mask_iaqZ ;
Amaroq+Dial/Ngr:Amaroq Z1Mask_AĸajaroĸZ ;
Amaroĸ+Dial/Ngr:Amaroĸ Z1Mask_AĸajaroĸZ ;
Ameq+Dial/Vgr:Ameq Z1Fem_meqZ ;
Anguaq+Dial/Ngr:Anguaq Z1Fem_iaqZ ; !Anguasap?
Angutêraĸ+Dial/Vgr:Angutêraĸ Z1Mask_araqZ ;
Apannguaq+Dial/Vgr:Apannguaq Z1Mask_nnguaqZ ;
Apũnguaκ:Apũnguaκ Z1Fem_nnguaqZ ;
Aput:Aput Z1Fem_tptZ ;
Aput:Aput Z1Mask_tptZ ;
Arfâraĸ+Dial/Vgr:Arfâraĸ Z1Fem_araqZ ;
Arnaviaq+Dial/Vgr:Arnaviaq Z1Fem_iaqZ ;
Arnaviaĸ+Dial/Vgr:Arnaviaĸ Z1Fem_iaĸZ ;
Arsugaq:Arsugaq Z1Fem_gaqZ ;
Asarpannguarsuaq+Dial/Ngr:Asarpannguarsuaq Z2Mask_suaqZ ;
Avalequt+Dial/Vgr:Avalequt Z1Fem_tptZ ;
Avaleĸut+Dial/Vgr:Avaleĸut Z1Fem_tptZ ;
Avarúnguaĸ:Avarúnguaĸ Z1Fem_nnguaqZ ;
Avianngorneq+Dial/Ngr:Avianngorneq Z2Fem_niqZ ;
Avo:Avo Z1Fem_ateqZ ; 
Bodin:Bodin ZMask_oqsZ ;
Bruce Z1ateqpropZ ;
Debora:Debora Z1Fem_araqZ ;
Domenico:Domenico Z1Mask_ateqZ ;
Eĸalugaĸ+Dial/Vgr:Eĸalugaĸ Z1Mask_gaqZ ;
Edel:Edel ZFem_oqsZ ;
Ella:Ella Z1Fem_ateqZ ;
Eqariusarsuaq+Dial/Ngr:Eqariusarsuaq Z2Fem_suaqZ ;
Erinaq+Dial/Sgr:Erinaq Z1Mask_naqZ ;
Erinaĸ+Dial/Sgr:Erinaĸ Z1Mask_naqZ ;
Erneeraq+Dial/Vgr:Erneeraq Z1Mask_araqZ ;
Fabian:Fabian ZMask_oqsZ ;
Farîtarik:Farîtarik Z2Mask_kZ ;
Folke-Ferie Z1ateqpropZ ;
Genesaretip ZpossessorSZ ;
Griikerit ZpossessorPZ ;
Grækerit ZpossessorPZ ;
Habib:Habib ZFem_oqsZ ;
Hansi:Hansi Z1Mask_GrlateqZ ;
Ilaatsunnguaq+Dial/Ngr:Ilaatsunnguaq Z1Mask_nnguaqZ ;
Ilaitsoq+Dial/Ngr:Ilaitsoq Z1Fem_GrlateqZ ;
Imaneĸ+Dial/Vgr:Imaneĸ Z2Mask_niqZ ;
Inaluaq+Dial/Vgr:Inaluaq Z1Mask_gaqZ ;
Inuaĸ+Dial/Vgr:Inuaĸ Z1Mask_iaqZ ;
Inukuaĸ+Dial/Sgr:Inukuaĸ Z1Fem_iaĸZ ;
Isaroĸ+Dial/Vgr:Isaroĸ Z1Mask_AĸajaroĸZ ;
Itamari Z1ateqpropZ ;
Ivalorsuaq+Dial/Ngr:Ivalorsuaq Z2Fem_suaqZ ;
Ivernâjik+Dial/Egr:Ivernâjik Z2Fem_kZ ; 
Jerry:Jerry Z1Mask_ateqZ ;
K'arasaĸ+Dial/Vgr:K'arasaĸ Z1Mask_saqZ ; 
K'ilagoĸ+Dial/Vgr:K'ilagoĸ Z1Mask_goqZ ;
K'ilugoĸ+Dial/Vgr:K'ilugoĸ Z1Mask_iaĸZ ;
K'issugssuaĸ+Dial/Ngr:K'issugssuaĸ Z2Mask_suaqZ ;
K'ugdlugiaĸ+Dial/Vgr:K'ugdlugiaĸ Z1Mask_iaĸZ ;
Kaakajik+Dial/Egr:Kaakajik Z2Mask_kZ ;
Kanioq+Dial/Vgr:Kanioq Z1Mask_ioqZ ;
Kanioĸ+Dial/Vgr:Kanioĸ Z1Mask_ioqZ ;
Karrup% Nuua ZpossessumSZ ;
Kitaa+Sem/Geo:Kitaa ZpossessumZ ;
Kitigaq+Dial/Vgr:Kitigaq Z1Fem_gaqZ ;
Klein:Klein ZMask_oqsZ ;
Kusugaq+Dial/Vgr:Kusugaq Z1Mask_gaqZ ;
Kûnstânse:Kûnstânse Z1Fem_ateqZ ;
Laapanni:Laapanni Z1Mask_GrlateqZ ;
Løwe Z1ateqpropZ ;
Maiken:Maiken ZFem_oqsZ ;
Makiuarneĸ+Dial/Sgr:Makiuarneĸ Z2Fem_niqZ ;
Maligiaĸ+Dial/Vgr:Maligiaĸ Z1Mask_iaĸZ ;
Mamagoĸ+Dial/Vgr:Mamagoĸ Z1Mask_goqZ ;
Mamiaĸ+Dial/Egr:Mamiaĸ Z1Fem_iaĸZ ;
Manguaraĸ+Dial/Vgr:Manguaraĸ Z1Mask_araqZ ;
Marraĸ+Dial/Vgr:Marraĸ Z1Fem_araqZ ;
Marriortup ZpossessorSZ ;
Meqqunnguaq+Dial/Vgr:Meqqunnguaq Z1Mask_nnguaqZ ;
Merĸúnguaĸ+Dial/Vgr:Merĸúnguaĸ Z1Fem_nnguaqZ ; 
Michaela:Michaela Z1Fem_GrlateqZ ;
Mássagaĸ+Dial/Vgr:Mássagaĸ Z1Mask_gaqZ ;
Nanoq:Nanoq Z1Mask_noqZ ;
Nanoq:Nanoq Z1Mask_noqZ ;
Napparut+Dial/Vgr:Napparut Z1Mask_tptZ ;
Nasaq+Dial/Vgr:Nasaq Z1Mask_saqZ ;
Niaqoq+Dial/Vgr:Niaqoq Z1Mask_qoqZ ;
Niaĸoĸ+Dial/Vgr:Niaĸoĸ Z1Fem_qoqZ ; 
Niaĸoĸ+Dial/Vgr:Niaĸoĸ Z1Mask_qoqZ ;
Norragaq+Dial/Vgr:Norragaq Z1Fem_gaqZ ;
Nutaqqak+Dial/Egr:Nutaqqak Z2Fem_kZ ;
Náparut+Dial/Vgr:Náparut Z1Mask_tptZ ;
Nãngo:Nãngo Z1Mask_ateqZ ;
Nunap% Isua	ZpossessumZ ;
Oĸûtaĸ+Dial/Vgr:Oĸûtaĸ Z1Mask_taqZ ;
Oqqisaat+Dial/Egr:Oqqisaat Z1Mask_tptZ ;
Oquutaq+Dial/Vgr:Oquutaq Z1Mask_taqZ ;
Palleq+Dial/Vgr+Dial/Ngr:Palleq Z2Mask_niqZ ;
Panêraĸ+Dial/Vgr:Panêraĸ Z1Fem_araĸZ ;
Pikêra:Pikêra Z1Fem_araĸZ ;
Pilutaq+Dial/Vgr:Pilutaq Z1Mask_taqZ ;
Pilutaq+Dial/Vgr:Pilutaq Z1Fem_taqZ ;
Pingajuat:Pingajuat Z1Mask_atZ ;
Pooruseq+Dial/Vgr:Pooruseq Z1Mask_seqZ ;
Putdlaĸ+Dial/Ngr:Putdlaĸ Z1Mask_GrlateqZ ;
Pôruseĸ+Dial/Vgr:Pôruseĸ Z1Mask_seqZ ;
Qalaseq+Dial/Vgr:Qalaseq Z1Mask_seqZ ;
Qarasaq+Dial/Vgr:Qarasaq Z1Mask_saqZ ;
Qimmeruaq+Dial/Vgr:Qimmeruaq Z1Fem_iaqZ ;
Qullugiaq+Dial/Vgr:Qullugiaq Z1Mask_iaqZ ;
Qungaseq+Dial/Vgr:Qungaseq Z1Mask_seqZ ;
Raakiilli:Raakiilli Z1Fem_GrlateqZ ;
Rud:Rud ZMask_oqsZ ;
Salomop% Sukaliutaa ZpossessumSZ ;
Sapangaq+Dial/Sgr:Sapangaq Z1Fem_ngaqZ ;
Sapangaĸ+Dial/Sgr:Sapangaĸ Z1Fem_ngaqZ ;
Sauneq+Dial/Ngr:Sauneq Z2Fem_neqZ ;
Sauneĸ+Dial/Ngr:Sauneĸ Z2Fem_neqZ ;
Saunínguaĸ+Dial/Ngr:Saunínguaĸ Z1Fem_nnguaqZ ;
Savat ZpossessorPZ ;
Seqineq+Dial/Vgr:Seqineq Z2Mask_neqZ ;
Seqineq+Dial/Vgr:Seqineq Z2Fem_neqZ ;
Sianeq+Dial/Vgr:Sianeq Z2Mask_neqZ ;
Sine:Sine Z1Fem_ateqZ ;
Synovate Z1ateqpropZ ;
Tajarneĸ+Dial/Vgr:Tajarneĸ Z2Mask_kZ ;
Taleroq+Dial/Vgr:Taleroq Z1Fem_qoqZ ;
Taleroĸ+Dial/Vgr:Taleroĸ Z1Fem_qoqZ ;
Talîlánguaĸ+Dial/Ngr:Talîlánguaĸ Z1Mask_nnguaqZ ;
Tiaraq+Dial/Sgr:Tiaraq Z1Fem_araqZ ;
Tinneraq+Dial/Vgr:Tinneraq Z1Mask_araqZ ;
Trudy:Trudy ZFem_oqsZ ;
Tuluit% Nunaat ZpossessumZ ;
Tuneq+Dial/Ngr:Tuneq Z2Mask_neqZ ; !?Skal den være Torngup? Eller?
Ujaratsiaq+Dial/Vgr:Ujaratsiaq Z1Mask_GrlateqZ ;
Ujarneq+Dial/Egr+Dial/Vgr:Ujarneq Z2Mask_niqZ ;
Ujarneq+Dial/Egr+Dial/Vgr:Ujarneq Z2Fem_niqZ ;
Ukaleq+Dial/Vgr:Ukaleq Z1Fem_leqZ ;
Ukaleq+Dial/Vgr:Ukaleq Z1Mask_leqZ ;
Ukaleĸ+Dial/Vgr:Ukaleĸ Z1Fem_leqZ ;
Ukaleĸ+Dial/Vgr:Ukaleĸ Z1Mask_leqZ ;
Uuliap ZpossessorSZ ;
Uullat:Uullat Z1Fem_GrlateqZ ;
Víto:Víto Z1Mask_ateqZ ;
Ámak:Ámak Z2Fem_kZ ;
Âpilarssuaĸ+Dial/Ngr:Âpilarssuaĸ Z2Mask_suaqZ ;
Ârĸat+Dial/Vgr:Ârĸat Z1Fem_tptZ ;
Ítuat:Ítuat Z1Mask_atZ ;
Ítússaarsuaĸ+Dial/Ngr:Ítússaarsuaĸ Z2Fem_suaqZ ;
Fyllas% Banke Z1geopropZ ;
Lauderdale Z1geopropZ ;
Qeqqata% Kommunia   ZpossessumSZ ;
Sankelmarksgade Z1geopropZ ;
Vorbasse Z1geopropZ ;
